Nebraska, session 109, LB518.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 83-1,100.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
83-1,100.03 (1) The board, in consultation with the department, shall
adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to reduce the number of inmates
under the custody of the department who serve their entire sentence in a
correctional facility and are released without supervision. The rules and
regulations shall establish clear guidelines and procedures to ensure that each
parolee is subject to a minimum of nine months of supervision and shall place
priority on providing supervision lengths that enable meaningful transition
periods for all offenders. The rules and regulations shall ensure that each
inmate eligible for parole is assessed for risk of reoffending using a
validated risk and needs assessment provided by the department and shall
incorporate into the release decision an inmate's assessed risk of reoffending,
past criminal history, program completion, institutional conduct, and other
individual characteristics related to the likelihood of reoffending into parole
release decisions.
(2) By February 1 of each year, the board and the department shall
electronically submit a report to the Legislature, the Supreme Court, and the
Governor. The report shall:
(a) Describe that describes the percentage of offenders sentenced to the
custody of the department who complete their entire sentence and are released
with no supervision; .
(b) Document The report shall document characteristics of the individuals
released without supervision, including the highest felony class of conviction,
offense type of conviction, most recent risk assessment, status of the
individualized release or reentry plan, and reasons for the release without
supervision; .
(c) Provide The report also shall provide recommendations from the
department and board for changes to policy and practice to meet the goal of
achieving a reduction in the number of inmates under the custody of the
department who serve their entire sentence in a correctional facility and are
released without supervision; and . The report to the Legislature shall be
submitted electronically.
(d) Contain information regarding:
(i) The number of inmates eligible for parole who remain incarcerated,
disaggregated by the reason for such status;
(ii) Revocations of parole during the preceding year, disaggregated by the
reason for revocation;
(iii) Hearings to grant or revoke parole conducted in the preceding year;
(iv) Rehabilitation and recidivism of parolees;
(v) Cost savings to the state resulting from individuals being paroled
rather than incarcerated; and
(vi) Other matters the director deems appropriate.
(3) The department, in consultation with the board, shall maintain a list
of individuals who are eligible for parole but are expected to complete their
entire sentence in the custody of the department and be released with no
supervision. This list shall be used to facilitate the placement of committed
offenders in community work release and reentry centers under the Community
Work Release and Reentry Centers Act.
Sec. 2. Original section 83-1,100.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-1-